Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Child Support Unit

§ 43-19-31.
Child support unit authorized; purposes.

The Department of Human Services is hereby authorized and empowered to establish a single and separate Child Support Unit for the following purposes:

To develop and implement a nonsupport and paternity program and institute proceedings in the name of the Department of Human Services or in the name of the recipient in any court of competent jurisdiction in any county where the mother of the child resides or is found, in the county where the father resides or is found, or in the county where the child resides or is found;

To secure and collect support by any method authorized under state law and establish paternity for any child or children receiving aid from the department any form of public assistance, including, but not limited to, medical assistance, foster care, food stamps, TANF, or any other program under the federal Social Security Act, from a parent or any other person legally liable for such support who has either failed or refused to provide support, deserted, neglected or abandoned the child or children, including cooperating with other states in establishing paternity, locating absent parents and securing compliance with court orders for support of Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) children; the department may petition the court for the inclusion of health insurance as part of any child support order on behalf of any child receiving aid from the department unless good cause for noncooperation, as defined by the Social Security Act or the Mississippi Department of Human Services, is established. Unless notified to the contrary, whenever a child or children for whom child support services have been provided ceases to receive public assistance, the department will continue to provide services and establish paternity, secure and collect such support payments from a parent or any other person legally liable for such support in accordance with the standards prescribed pursuant to the federal Social Security Act;

To accept applications for child support enforcement services to establish paternity, secure and collect support from any proper party or person as defined by Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act notwithstanding the fact that the child or children do not currently receive or have never received public assistance. The department shall have the authority to secure and collect support by any method authorized under state law and establish paternity for any child or children on behalf of a recipient of child support services, including individuals who do not currently receive or have never received public assistance from a parent or any other person legally liable for such support who has either failed or refused to provide support, deserted, neglected or abandoned the child or children, including cooperating with other states in establishing paternity, locating absent parents and securing compliance with court orders for support; the department may petition the court for the inclusion of health insurance as part of any child support order on behalf of such recipients of child support services. The proceeds of any collections resulting from such application shall be distributed in accordance with the standards prescribed in the federal Social Security Act;

The department shall seek to recover from the individual who owes a support obligation to any individual who is a recipient of Title IV-D services as set forth in paragraph (b) or (c) on whose behalf the department is providing services, upon judicial proceedings conducted thereon after advance notice to such obligor, reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs, in excess of any administrative fees collected and in excess of amounts of current support owed by the obligor, which the department incurs in recovering and collecting the support obligation, such costs and fees as the department recovers to be deposited in the Special Fund of the Mississippi Department of Human Services which is hereby established for the pursuit and collection of child support;

To initiate contempt of court proceedings or any other remedial proceedings necessary to enforce (i) any order or decree of court relating to child support, and (ii) any order or decree of court relating to the maintenance and/or alimony of a parent where support collection services on his or her child’s behalf are being provided by the department;

To secure and collect by any method authorized under state law any maintenance and/or alimony on behalf of a parent whose child or children’s support is being collected by the department. The department shall collect only such maintenance and/or alimony as is ordered or decreed by the court, and only in the event that the minor child and parent to whom such maintenance and/or alimony has been ordered are living in the same household;

To obtain restitution of monies expended for public assistance from a parent or any other person legally liable for the support of any child or children receiving aid from the department; said action for restitution shall arise from the payment of public assistance for the dependent child or children and shall be for the amount of the public assistance paid. Said action for restitution shall not arise against the parent or other person legally responsible who receives public assistance for the benefit of any dependent child or children. When a court order of support has been issued, the amount recoverable shall be limited to the amount of the court order;

Setting off against a debtor’s income tax refund or rebate any debt which is in the form of a liquidated sum due and owing for the care, support or maintenance of a child;

To have full responsibility in the aforementioned cases for initiating actions under the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act and for responding to the actions of other jurisdictions under said law when Mississippi is the responding state; however, this shall not impair private litigants’ rights to proceed under any applicable interstate enforcement mechanisms;

To enter into contracts for the purpose of performing any test which the department may, from time to time, require;

To maintain a Central Receipting and Disbursement Unit to which all payments required by withholding orders and orders for support in all actions to which the Department of Human Services is a party shall be forwarded, and from which child support payments ordered by the court in actions to which the Department of Human Services is a party shall be disbursed to the custodial parent or other such party as may be designated by the court order. The Central Receipting and Disbursement Unit shall be operated by the Department of Human Services or any financial institution having operations and qualified to do business in Mississippi, whose deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. The department shall conduct cost-benefit analyses to determine and utilize the more cost efficient manner of operating the unit;

To maintain a Mississippi Department of Human Services Case Registry containing records with respect to:

Each case in which services are being provided by the department under this section; and

Each support order established or modified in Mississippi on or after October 1, 1998; and

The Administrative Office of Courts, as established by Section 9-21-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, in consultation with the Mississippi Department of Human Services, shall devise, promulgate and require the use of a Uniform Child Support Order Tracking System.

1. Information collected from case filing forms shall be furnished to the Mississippi Department of Human Services, Division of Child Support Enforcement, in order that compliance with court-ordered obligations of support may be tracked with specificity throughout the duration of said obligations and any subsequent proceedings.

2. Such tracking system shall include: 1. the names, residential and mailing addresses, telephone numbers, Social Security numbers, driver’s license numbers and dates of birth of each child and parent named in or subject to the court order; 2. the court cause number of the action; 3. name, address and telephone number of employer; 4. any restraining or protective order indicating domestic violence; and 5. any other information which may be used for the purpose of identifying any person named in or subject to the order or for the purposes of establishing, enforcing or modifying a child support order;

To take administrative actions relating to genetic testing, determine paternity, establish child support orders, modification of child support orders, income withholding, liens and subpoenas without the necessity of obtaining an order from any judicial or other administrative tribunal with respect to cases initiated or enforced by the department pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act;

To have the authority to use high-volume automated administrative enforcement in interstate cases to the same extent as used for intrastate cases, in response to a request made by another state to enforce support orders; and

To provide any child support enforcement or other service as may be required by the United States of America, Department of Health and Human Services, Family Support Administration, Office of Child Support Enforcement or their successor pursuant to federal law or regulation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 483, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 320; Laws, 1983, ch. 393, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 518, § 14; Laws, 1987, ch. 455, § 5; Laws, 1989, ch. 440, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 512, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 514, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 19, 2003.).

§ 43-19-33.
Force and effect of written stipulated agreement to support and written admission of paternity containing agreement of support.

In lieu of legal proceedings instituted to obtain support for a dependent child from the responsible parent, a written stipulated agreement to support said child by periodic payments executed by the responsible parent when acknowledged before a clerk of the court having jurisdiction over such matters or a notary public and filed with and approved by the judge of said court shall have the same force and effect, retroactively and prospectively, in accordance with the terms of said agreement as an order of support entered by the court, and shall be enforceable and subject to modification in the same manner as is provided by law for orders of the court in such cases.

In lieu of legal proceedings instituted to establish paternity, a written admission of paternity containing a stipulated agreement of support executed by the putative father of the dependent child, when accompanied by a written affirmation of paternity executed and sworn to by the mother of the dependent child, when acknowledged by the putative father before a clerk of the court having jurisdiction over such matters or a notary public and filed with and approved by the judge of said court, shall have the same force and effect, retroactively and prospectively, in accordance with the terms of said agreement, as an order of filiation and support entered by the court, and shall be enforceable and subject to modification in the same manner as is provided by law for orders of the court in such cases.

At any time after filing with the court having continuing jurisdiction of such matters of an acknowledgment of paternity in which a provision of support has not been entered, upon notice the defendant shall be required to appear in court at any time and place named therein, to show cause, if any he can, why the court should not enter an order for the support of the child by periodic payments. The order may include provisions for reimbursement for medical expenses incident to the pregnancy and the birth of the child, accrued maintenance and reasonable expenses of the action under this subsection on the acknowledgment of paternity previously filed with said court. Notice by the department to the defendant shall be given by certified mail, restricted delivery, return receipt requested at his last known mailing address and without the requirement of a summons being issued, and shall be deemed complete as of the date of delivery as evidenced by the return receipt. The required notice may also be delivered by personal service in accordance with Rule 4 of the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure insofar as service of an administrative order or notice is concerned. Provided, that in the case of a child who, upon reaching the age of twenty-one (21) years, is mentally or physically incapable of self-support, the putative father shall not be relieved of the duty of support unless said child is a long-term patient in a facility owned or operated by the State of Mississippi. The prior judgment as to paternity shall be res judicata as to that issue and shall not be reconsidered by the court.

Such agreements of support, acknowledgments and affirmations of paternity and support shall be sworn to and shall be binding on the person executing the same whether he be an adult or a minor and may include provisions for the reimbursement of medical expenses incident to the pregnancy and birth of the child, accrued maintenance and reasonable expenses of any action previously filed before the court.

In lieu of legal proceedings instituted to enforce an order for support, a written stipulated agreement for the provision of periodic payments towards an arrearage executed by the defendant when acknowledged before a clerk of the court having jurisdiction over such matters or a notary public and filed with and approved by the judge of said court shall have the same force and effect, retroactively and prospectively, in accordance with the terms of said agreement as a judgment for overdue support entered by the court, and shall be enforceable and subject to modification in the same manner as is provided by law for orders of the court in such cases.

All agreements entered into under the provisions as set forth hereinabove shall be filed by the clerk of the court having jurisdiction over such matters in the county in which they are entered and filing fees shall be taxed to the responsible parent.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 483, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 393, § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 390, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 512, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 43-19-34.
Stipulated agreement for modification of support order; Child Support Unit authorized to send motion and notice of intent to modify; reviews for possible modification to be conducted on 3-year cycle; only upward adjustments to be ordered retroactively; noncustodial parent’s arrearage not to bar review or downward modification.

In lieu of legal proceedings instituted to obtain a modification for an order for support, a written stipulated agreement for modification executed by the responsible parent when acknowledged before a clerk of the court having jurisdiction over those matters or a notary public and filed with and approved by the judge of that court shall have the same force and effect, retroactively and prospectively, in accordance with the terms of the agreement as an order for modification of support entered by the court, and shall be enforceable and subject to later modification in the same manner as is provided by law for orders of the court in those cases.

With respect to a child support order in cases initiated or enforced by the Department of Human Services under Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, in which the department has determined that a modification is appropriate, the department shall send a motion and notice of intent to modify the order, together with the proposed modification of the order under this section to the last known mailing address of the defendant. The notice shall specify the date and time certain of the hearing and shall be sent by certified mail, restricted delivery, return receipt requested; notice shall be deemed complete as of the date of delivery as evidenced by the return receipt. The required notice may also be delivered by personal service in accordance with Rule 4 of the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure insofar as it may be applied to service of an administrative order or notice. The defendant may accept the proposed modification by signing and returning it to the department before the date of hearing for presentation to the court for approval. If the defendant does not sign and return the proposed modification, the court shall on the date and time previously set for hearing review the proposal and make a determination as to whether it should be approved, in whole or in part.

Every three (3) years, the Department of Human Services shall notify both parents of their right to request a review, and upon the request of either parent, or if there is an assignment under Section 43-19-35, the department, after a review and determination of appropriateness, or either parent may seek an adjustment to a support order being enforced under Section 43-19-31 in accordance with the guidelines established under Section 43-19-101, if the amount of the child support award under the order differs from the amount that would be awarded in accordance with the guidelines, taking into account the best interests of the child involved. If a recipient of Title IV-D services receives TANF, the Department of Human Services shall conduct a review every three (3) years and, after a determination of appropriateness, shall seek an adjustment to a support order according to the guidelines under Section 43-19-101. No proof of a material change in circumstances is necessary in the three-year review for adjustment under this subsection (3). A preexisting arrearage in support payments shall not serve as a bar to the department’s review and adjustment procedure. Proof of a material change in circumstances is necessary for modification outside the three-year cycle.

Any order for the support of minor children, whether entered through the judicial system or through an expedited process, shall not be subject to a downward retroactive modification. An upward retroactive modification may be ordered back to the date of the event justifying the upward modification.

If a downward modification is determined to be warranted under the guidelines contained in subsection (3), the noncustodial parent’s arrearage, if any, shall not be a basis for contesting the downward modification in any later legal proceedings.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 512, § 12; Laws, 2000, ch. 530, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 548, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 465, § 4; Laws, 2011, ch. 530, § 8; Laws, 2012, ch. 552, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 2012.).

§ 43-19-35.
Acceptance of public assistance for child as assignment to department of recipient’s rights against nonsupporting parent; status of attorney initiating proceedings.

By currently or previously accepting public assistance or making application for child support services for and on behalf of a child or children, the recipient shall be deemed to have made an assignment to the State Department of Human Services of any and all rights and interests in any cause of action, past, present or future, that said recipient or the children may have against any parent failing to provide for the support and maintenance of said minor child or children; said department shall be subrogated to any and all rights, title and interest the recipient or the children may have against any and all property belonging to the absent or nonsupporting parent in the enforcement of any claim for child or spousal support, whether liquidated through court order or not. The recipient of Title IV-D services shall also be deemed, without the necessity of signing any document, to have appointed the State Department of Human Services to act in his or her, as well as the children’s, name, place, and stead to perform the specific act of instituting suit to establish paternity or secure support, collecting any and all amounts due and owing for child or spousal support or any other service as required or permitted under Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act, and endorsing any and all drafts, checks, money orders or other negotiable instruments representing child or spousal support payments which are received on behalf of the recipient or the children, and retaining any portion thereof permitted under federal and state statutes as reimbursement for public assistance monies previously paid to the recipient or children.

Court orders of support for any child or children receiving services through Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act shall be amended, by operation of law, and without the necessity of a motion by the Child Support Unit and a hearing thereon to provide that the payment of support shall be directed by the absent parent to the Mississippi Department of Human Services Central Receipting and Disbursement Unit as provided in Section 43-19-37 and not to the recipient. The absent parent shall be notified of such amendment prior to it taking effect.

Any attorney authorized by the state to initiate any action pursuant to Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act, including, but not limited to, any action initiated pursuant to Sections 43-19-31 et seq. and 93-25-1 et seq. shall be deemed to represent the interest of the State Department of Human Services exclusively; no attorney-client relationship shall exist between said attorney and any recipient of services pursuant to Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act for and on behalf of a child or children, regardless of the name in which the legal proceedings are initiated. Said attorney representing the state in a Title IV-D case is only authorized to appear and prosecute and/or defend issues of support and cannot in a Title IV-D case address or provide representation to the Title IV-D recipient on any other ancillary issues raised or presented in that action.

Said assignment to the State Department of Human Services shall be free of any legal or equitable defense to the payment of child support that may accrue to any person legally liable for the support of any child or children receiving aid from the State Department of Human Services, as a result of the conduct of the person who is accepting public assistance for and on behalf of said child or children.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 483, § 3; Laws, 1983, ch. 393, § 3; Laws, 1989, ch. 376, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 496, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 393, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 514, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 19, 2003.).

§ 43-19-37.
Court orders of support to direct payment of support, attorney’s fees and court costs to child support unit and not recipient.

Court orders of support in all cases brought under the provisions of Sections 43-19-31 through 43-19-53 shall specify that the payment of court costs shall be directed by the absent parent to the Mississippi Department of Human Services Central Receipting and Disbursement Unit for further disbursement in the manner as prescribed by Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act. The court shall assess attorney’s fees to recover the costs associated with preparing and prosecuting the case, which shall be paid directly to the Mississippi Department of Human Services solely for the support of the legal division of the Child Support Unit, in a manner separate and distinct from the payment of child support. The court may allow the defendant to pay the attorney’s fee over a period not to exceed four (4) months. The state portion of attorney’s fees paid into the department shall be used to match federal funds for the support of the legal division of the Child Support Unit, in conjunction with the Office of Attorney General. Any payments made by the absent parent directly to the recipient or applicant in violation of the court order shall not be deemed to be a support payment or an attorney’s fee and shall not be credited to the court-ordered obligation of said absent parent or to the court-ordered obligation for the payment of the attorney’s fee. Failure of the absent parent to comply with an order of support or for payment of an attorney’s fee for a period of thirty (30) days shall be directed to the court having jurisdiction of the matter for contempt proceedings or execution issued in the manner and form prescribed by statute. Should civil proceedings become ineffective in producing support or attorney’s fees in any case involving a legitimate child or a child wherein paternity has been established by law or acknowledged in writing, the case shall promptly be referred to the district attorney for prosecution as a violation of Section 97-5-3.

Each application, petition, order or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant or father, mother and child(ren), as applicable, in accordance with Section 93-11-64, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 483, § 4; Laws, 1983, ch. 393, § 4; Laws, 1989, ch. 440, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 3; Laws, 2003, ch. 514, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 19, 2003.).

§ 43-19-39.
Distribution of child support payments; suits by child support unit; citation of noncooperating recipient parent; withholding payments for reimbursement of erroneous past payments.

All child support payments collected by the child support unit pursuant to Section 43-19-35 shall be distributed in the manner as prescribed by the federal Social Security Act and any amendments adopted thereto. Nothing contained herein shall preclude the child support unit in processing a paternity or support action for and on behalf of a child or children receiving aid to dependent children grants wherein the applicant or recipient has refused cooperation. If a parent of any child receiving public assistance fails or refuses to cooperate with the local county department or child support unit in locating and securing support from the nonsupporting responsible parent, this parent may be cited to appear before the judge of any court having jurisdiction over such matter and compelled to disclose such information under oath. Any parent who, having been cited to appear before a judge of the court having jurisdiction over such matter, fails or refuses to appear or fails or refuses to provide the information requested may be found to be in contempt of said court and may be fined not more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) or imprisoned not more than six (6) months or both.

In a manner which is consistent with the federal Social Security Act, any amendments thereto and its implementing regulations, the child support unit is hereby authorized to withhold from distribution any payment or portion thereof which it may receive on behalf of a child or children for whom it is providing services if reimbursement is needed for any payments which may have been mistakenly or erroneously advanced on behalf of that child or children. The child support unit shall adopt policies that minimize any hardship that is caused by withholding from distribution any current support payments to reimburse past mistaken or erroneous advancements.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 483, § 5; Laws, 1996, ch. 498, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 43-19-41.
Effect of applicant’s or recipient’s refusal to assist in finding absent parent or in securing support or establishing paternity.

Any applicant or recipient who refuses to provide reasonable assistance to the local county department or to the child support unit established by the state department of public welfare in identifying and locating the absent parent of a dependent child or otherwise refuses to cooperate with the department in securing support or in establishing paternity shall be ineligible for aid to dependent children, shall not be considered a needy relative and shall not be entitled to receive or use any part of the aid in grant nor shall be eligible for medical assistance under the Mississippi Medical Assistance Act; provided, however, that aid for the support of the child of such applicant or recipient shall not be denied or terminated as a result of such refusal to provide assistance or cooperation, but that the department may provide aid to said child in the form of protective vendor payments.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 483, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

§ 43-19-43.
Husband-wife privilege; self-incriminating testimony.

The mother or father are competent to testify at the trial against the other as provided in Section 13-1-5 subject to the provisions of the Mississippi Rules of Evidence governing the husband-wife privilege. If a parent called for examination declines to answer upon the grounds that his testimony may incriminate him, the court may require him to answer, in which event he shall not thereafter be prosecuted for any criminal acts involved in the conception of the child whose paternity is in issue and/or for whom support is sought, except for perjury committed in his testimony.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 483, § 7; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 110, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 43-19-44.
Safeguarding of personal data where evidence of risk of harm; definitions; petition for release of information.

For purposes of this section, an “authorized person” shall mean:

Any agent or attorney of any state having in effect a plan approved under federal law, who has the duty or authority under such plan to seek to recover any amounts owed as child and spousal support (including, when authorized under the state plan, any official of a political subdivision);

The court which has authority to issue an order or to serve as the initiating court in an action to seek an order against a noncustodial parent of the support and maintenance of a child, or any agent of such court;

The resident parent, legal guardian, attorney or agent of a child (other than a child receiving federal assistance as determined by federal regulation) without regard to the existence of a court order against a noncustodial parent who has a duty to support and maintain any such child;

A state agency that is administering a program operated under a state plan approved under federal law;

Any agent or attorney of any state having an agreement under this section, who has the duty or authority under the law of such state to enforce a child custody or visitation determination;

Any court having jurisdiction to make or enforce such a child custody or visitation determination, or any agent of such court; and

Any agent or attorney of the United States, or of a state having an agreement under this section, who has the duty or authority to investigate, enforce or bring a prosecution with respect to the unlawful taking or restraint of a child.

The department shall safeguard personal data if the department is provided with reasonable evidence of a risk of harm. A state agency, court, department of another state, obligor, obligee and such other persons or entities as the department may specify may provide the department with reasonable evidence of a risk of harm in such manner as the department may require. The department shall not be required to safeguard personal data in intrastate cases for longer than one (1) year unless the department is provided with reasonable evidence of a continued risk of harm in such manner as the department may require. The department shall notify individuals whose personal data is safeguarded under this section that in order for the safeguards to remain in effect, such individuals must provide the department annually with reasonable evidence of a continued risk of harm. For the purposes of this section “reasonable evidence of a risk of harm” shall mean reasonable evidence that the release of information may result in physical harm to the parent or child, that the release of information may result in emotional harm to the parent or child which would significantly reduce the parent’s capacity to care for the child, or would significantly reduce the parent or child’s ability to function adequately, or that a protective order or restraining order has been issued on behalf of the parent or child.

If the department is provided with reasonable evidence of a risk of harm, the department, its employees and its contractors shall not disclose any personal data that could otherwise be disclosed about the location of a parent or child, including residential address, telephone number and name, address and telephone number of employer, and shall not disclose the Social Security number of a parent or child; provided, however, that such personal data may be shared by and between employees of the department and its contractors; provided further, that the department may disclose such personal data to the Federal Parent Locator Service, to the court, or agent of a court that is authorized to receive information from the Federal Parent Locator Service established pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act.

Provided further, that the department may disclose the Social Security number of a child receiving IV-D services for the purposes directly connected to obtaining health care coverage for such child to an employer or provider of health care coverage.

If the department is provided with reasonable evidence of a risk of harm pursuant to this section, the department shall notify the Federal Parent Locator Service established pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act that a risk of harm exists. Upon order of the court in an intrastate matter the department shall release personal data, which may include location information and Social Security numbers, to such court or agent, as required by said Title IV-D of the Social Security Act; provided, however, that if the department has been provided with reasonable evidence of a risk of harm, the department shall notify the court or agent that the department has received such information; before making any disclosure of such personal data, the court is required to determine whether such disclosure to any other person could be harmful to the parent or child. A person or agency seeking disclosure of personal data which the department is prohibited from disclosing because of a risk of harm, but which could otherwise be disclosed, may file a petition with the chancery court to request disclosure of such personal data.

Upon an order by the court in interstate cases to override nondisclosure procedures in cases dealing with domestic violence, the court shall order the department to release this information within thirty (30) days of the order. Whereupon, the department shall transmit said court order to the Federal Office of Child Support Enforcement (OCSE), Federal Parent Locator Service (FPLS), whereby OCSE will notify the department of its decision to remove the nondisclosure code. Upon notification from OCSE, the department shall release said information unto the court.

Any unauthorized disclosure or unauthorized willful inspection made in a good faith effort to comply with this section shall not be considered a violation of this section.

A person or agency, including the department, seeking personal data which the department is prohibited from disclosing because of a risk of harm, but which could otherwise be disclosed or which the Federal Parent Locator Service established pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act is prohibited from disclosing because the Secretary of the Federal Department of Health and Human Services has been notified that there is a reasonable evidence of domestic violence or child abuse, may file a petition with the court where the person resides to request disclosure of such personal data. The petition shall specify the purpose for which such personal data is required. When a petition is filed, or when the court receives notice from the department that the department has been notified of a risk of harm, the court shall determine whether disclosure of personal data could be harmful to the parent or child before releasing such data to any other person or agency. In making such determination, the court shall notify the parent that the court has received a request to release personal data and shall provide a specific date by which the parent must object to release of the information and provide the basis for objection. The parent may provide such information in writing and shall not be required to appear in person to contest the release of information. The court shall also notify the department of any petition filed pursuant to this section and the department shall release to the court any information which it has been provided regarding the risk of harm; however, the department shall not be made a party to the action. Further, the attorney for the Department of Human Services, in any proceeding herein, shall not be deemed to be appearing in a representative capacity for any party. The court may also request information directly from the Federal Parent Locator Service from the department of another state, and from any other source.

In determining whether disclosure of personal data could be harmful to the parent or child, the court shall consider any relevant information provided by the parent or child, any information provided by the department or by the department of another state, and any evidence provided by the person seeking the personal data. Documentary evidence transmitted to the court by facsimile, telecopier or other means that do not provide an original writing may not be excluded from evidence on an objection based on the means of transmission. The court may permit a party or witness to be deposed or to testify by telephone, audiovisual means, or other electronic means.

The court may enter an order (1) impounding the personal data and prohibiting any disclosure by the court or its agents, (2) permitting disclosure by the court or its agents to a specific person or persons, or (3) removing any restrictions on disclosure by the court and its agents. An order permitting disclosure of personal data may specify the purposes for which the data may be used and may prohibit a person to whom the data is disclosed from making further disclosures to any other person. The court shall notify the department of any order entered pursuant to this section. Any person or agency who violates an order issued pursuant to this section may be held in contempt of court and subject to the penalties provided herein.

The court may disclose location information about a parent for the limited purpose of notifying the parent of a proceeding under this section or of any other proceeding in court, provided that such information shall not be disclosed to another party unless the court issues an order pursuant to this section permitting such disclosure.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 512, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1999.